Utah statutes.
32A-12-221.   Lawful detention.
(1) (a) For the purpose of informing a peace officer of a suspected violation
and subject to the requirements of Subsection (1)(c), a person described in
Subsection (1)(b) may:
(i)  detain a person; and
(ii)  hold any form of identification presented by the person.
(b)  The following may take an action described in Subsection (1)(a):
(i)  a state store employee;
(ii)  a package agent;
(iii)  a licensee or permittee under this title;
(iv)  a beer retailer; or
(v)  an employee of a person described in Subsections (1)(b)(i) through (iv).
(c)  A person described in Subsection (1)(b) may take an action described in
Subsection (1)(a) only:
(i)  if that person has reason to believe that the person against whom the
action is taken is:
(A)  in a facility where liquor or beer is sold; and
(B)  in violation of Section 32A-12-209, 32A-12-210, or 32A-12-211; and
(ii) (A)  in a reasonable manner; and
(B)  for a reasonable length of time.
(2) Unless the detention is unreasonable under all circumstances, the
detention or failure to detain does not create criminal or civil liability
for:
(a)  false arrest;
(b)  false imprisonment;
(c)  slander; or
(d)  unlawful detention.
